District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.02

Competitive sealed bids.

(a)

Contracts exceeding $100,000 shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding unless the CPO issues a determination and findings that use of competitive sealed bidding is not practicable or not in the best interests of the District.

(b)

Bids shall be solicited through an Invitation for Bids.

(c)

The Invitation for Bids may include special standards of responsibility to ensure that bidders are properly qualified to perform the work.

(d)

The Invitation for Bids shall state whether an award shall be made on the basis of the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated bid price. If the lowest evaluated bid price basis is used, the objective measurable criteria to be utilized shall be set forth in the Invitation for Bids.

(e)

(1)

The CPO shall provide public notice of the Invitation for Bids of not less than 14 days for contracts, unless the CPO issues a determination and findings that it is appropriate to shorten the notice period to a period of not less than 3 days. In making the determination and findings, the CPO shall consider factors including the complexity of the procurement, the type of goods or services being purchased, and the impact of a shortened notice period on competition.

(2)

(A)

The CPO shall maintain an Internet site that provides prospective contractors with public notice of opportunities to bid, notice of contract awards, and other relevant information about District procurements.

(B)

Public notice of an Invitation for Bids may include publication in newspapers or trade publications considered to be appropriate by the CPO to give adequate public notice.

(f)

Bids shall be opened publicly at the time and place designated in the Invitation for Bids; provided, that the opening may be conducted in a publicly accessible electronic forum. Each bid, with the name of the bidder and price offering contained therein, shall be recorded and be open to public inspection.

(g)

The contract shall be awarded after completion of evaluation procedures for competitive sealed bids.

(h)

Correction or withdrawal of bids shall be allowed only to the extent permitted by rules issued pursuant to this chapter.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 402, 58 DCR 1185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.91, § 2-351.04, § 2-354.01, § 2-355.02, and § 2-356.02.